Hawaii statutes.
§387-11 Rules and regulations. The
department of labor and industrial relations may make, issue, amend, and
rescind such rules and regulations as are necessary or appropriate to carry out
this chapter. The rules and regulations, without being limited thereto, and
without limiting the generality of the foregoing, may define terms used in this
chapter, may include such terms and conditions, including the restriction or
prohibition of industrial homework or of such other acts or practices, as the
department finds necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this
chapter, and to prevent the circumvention or evasion thereof and to safeguard
the standards therein established; and shall include such partial or total
restrictions or prohibitions on the employment (notwithstanding the payment of
one and one-half times the regular rate of pay) of employees in excess of the
hours specified in the first paragraph of section 387-3 as the department finds
necessary to prevent the reduction of wage rates for the purpose of evading the
penalizing effect of the overtime compensation provisions of the first
paragraph of section 387-3 or the circumvention by other devices of the intent
of such paragraph to reduce hours of labor; and shall provide for reasonable deductions
from the minimum wage applicable under this chapter for board, lodging, or
other similar services furnished by an employer to the employer's employees.

Rules and regulations of the department issued
pursuant to this section which relate to industrial homework or to employment
in excess of the hours specified in the first paragraph of section 387-3 shall
be made only after notice to interested persons and a public hearing by the
department at which such persons may be heard. [L Sp 1941, c 66, §8; RL 1945,
§4361; RL 1955, §94-11; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; am L 1965, c 96, §74; HRS
§387-11; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next